Maine, session 132, LD988.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11112 is enacted to read:
§11112. University of Maine System property
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person with a valid license or
permit under this chapter may hunt on University of Maine System property except for a
residential area or campus. The provisions of this chapter apply to hunting on University
of Maine System property.